trunk/apertium-hi-en/apertium-hi-en.hi.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--Testing Hindi English-->

<dictionary>

	<alphabet>ँं:अआइईउऊऋएऐओऔािुूेैोौकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनपफबभमयरलवशषसह्ी</alphabet>

	<sdefs>
<!-- Only the basic sdefs are put down -->

		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/>
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Number"/>
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="verb"/> 
		<sdef n="pres"/> 
		<sdef n="pp"/>
		<sdef n="case:any" 	c="any"/> 
		<sdef n="past"/> 
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/>
		<sdef n="m" 	c="masculine"/> 
		<sdef n="f" 	c="feminine"/>
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="singular"/> 
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="plural"/> 
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="any"/> 
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="first"/> 
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="second"/> 
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="third"/>
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" /> 

	</sdefs>

	<pardefs>

<!-- Punctuation adopted from Nepali-->

<pardef n="separa">
<e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l>                  <r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


	<!-- Adjectives -->


<!-- adjective "small" with variations छोटा, छोटी, छोटे  -->
<pardef n="छोट/ा__adj">
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                   <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- singular male -->
<e>       <p><l>ी</l>                                   <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e> <!--singular/Plural female -->
<e>       <p><l>े</l>                                   <r>ा<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="case:any"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!--Plural male -->
</pardef>


	<!-- Verbs -->
<!-- this is restricted for sees - see,v,m,s,3,0 -->
<pardef n="देख/ना__vblex">
<e>       <p><l>ता है</l>                                 <r>ना<s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="p3"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


	<!-- Nouns -->
<pardef n="लडक/ा__n">
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                   <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3" /></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>े</l> 					 <r>ा<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="बिल्ली__n">
<e>       <p><></l>                                   <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="p3" /></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- CC-->
<pardef n="और__cnjcoo">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

	<section id="main" type="inconditional">


<!-- Nouns -->
<e lm="लडका"><i>लडका</i><par n="लडक/ा__n"/></e>
<e lm="बिल्ली"><i>बिल्ली</i><par n="बिल्ली__n"/></e>
<e lm="हाथी"><i>हाथी</i><par n="बिल्ली__n"/></e>

<!-- Adjectives -->

<e lm="छोटा"><i>छोटा</i><par n="छोट/ा__adj"/></e>
<e lm="बडा"><i>बडा</i><par n="छोट/ा__adj"/></e>

<!-- Verb -->

<e lm="देख"><i>देख</i><par n="देख/ना__v"/></e>

<!-- CC -->
<e lm="और"><i>और</i><par n="और__cnjcoo"/></e>

	</section>
	<section id="final" type="inconditional">
	</section>
</dictionary>
